Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2222
Rights of natural persons.

Nothing contained in the Nebraska Professional Corporation Act is intended to alter the right of natural persons licensed to provide professional service to organize as a partnership, a limited liability company, an unincorporated association, a business trust, or any other lawful form of business organization.

Laws 1969, c. 121, § 22, p. 562;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 158.